Maine, session 132, LD1344.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6021, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Complaint for nonsurface mold. It is a breach of the implied warranty and
covenant of habitability to have an unhealthy level of nonsurface mold in a dwelling unit.
A local health officer shall investigate a complaint from a tenant about nonsurface mold
and issue a written report to the tenant and landlord within 90 days of receiving the
complaint from the tenant. If the report indicates that the local health officer found an
unhealthy level of nonsurface mold, the landlord is responsible for remediation and shall
initiate the process by showing the tenant a plan for remediation within 5 business days of
receiving the report. Once the nonsurface mold is removed, the local health officer shall
inspect the dwelling unit to verify that all surface mold has been remediated. If the landlord
does not successfully remediate the nonsurface mold within 60 days of the report, the tenant
may initiate a complaint under subsection 3. For the purposes of this subsection, a local
health officer is a person appointed pursuant to Title 22, section 451.